District of Columbia statutes.
10-513.01

Prior notice for federal activities affecting district property.

Repealed.

Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 784, Pub. L. 105-33, § 11715
Nov. 19, 1997, 111 Stat. 2186, Pub. L. 105-100, § 157(f)

History

1981 Ed., § 9-1001.

Prior Codifications

Editor's Notes

Pub. L. 105-33, title XI, § 11715, Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 784, added this section.

Pub. L. 105-100, title I, § 157(f), Nov. 19, 1997, 111 Stat. 2186, provided:

“(f) Repeal of prior notice requirement for Federal activities affecting real property in District of Columbia. Effective October 1, 1997, the Balanced Budget Act of 1997 (Public Law 105-33) is amended by striking section 11715.”